Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-144
Loans or extension of credit; improper; willful and knowing violation; liability.

Any officer or employee of any bank who willfully and knowingly violates any provision of sections 8-141 to 8-143.01 shall be liable under his or her bond for any loss to the bank resulting therefrom.

Laws 1909, c. 10, § 40, p. 86;

R.S.1913, § 319;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XVI, § 40, p. 701;

C.S.1922, § 8020;

C.S.1929, § 8-159;

R.S.1943, § 8-153;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 44, p. 152;

Laws 1994, LB 611, § 3;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 41.